Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 31. Attempt, Solicitation, and Conspiracy.

Cross references. —

For increase in classification of misdemeanors committed in connection with a criminal street gang, see AS

12.55.137

.

For provisions on insanity and competency to stand trial, see AS 12.47.

For provisions relating to punishment, see
AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies,
AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For restitution, see AS

12.55.045

.

Collateral references. —

21 Am. Jr. 2d, Criminal Law, §§ 149-156.

22 C.J.S., Criminal Law, §§ 148-163.

Attempts to receive stolen property, 85 ALR2d 259.

Escape or prison breach as affected by means employed, 96 ALR2d 520.

Attempts to commit offenses of larceny by trick, confidence game, false pretenses, and the like, 6 ALR3d 241.

Impotency as defense to charge of rape, attempt to rape, or assault with intent to commit rape, 23 ALR3d 1351.

Woman upon whom abortion is committed or attempted as accomplice for purposes of rule requiring corroboration of accomplice testimony, 34 ALR3d 858.

Comment note on impossibility of consummation of substantive crime as defense in criminal prosecution for conspiracy or attempt to commit crime,
37 ALR3d 375.

What constitutes attempted murder, 54 ALR3d 612.

Temporary unauthorized absence of prisoner as escape or attempted escape, 76 ALR3d 695.

What conduct amounts to an overt act or acts done toward commission of larceny so as to sustain charge of attempt to commit larceny, 76 ALR3d 842.

Robbery, attempted robbery, or assault to commit robbery, as affected by intent to collect or secure debt or claim, 88 ALR3d 1309.

What constitutes driving, operating, or being in control of motor vehicle for purposes of driving while intoxicated statutes,
93 ALR3d 7.

Use of force or intimidation in retaining property or in attempting to escape, rather than in taking property, as element of robbery,
93 ALR3d 643.

Criminal liability of third persons for death of another as result of accused’s attempt to kill self or assist another’s suicide, 40 ALR4th 702.

Impossibility of consummation as defense to prosecution for attempt, 41 ALR4th 588.

Fact that gun was unloaded as affecting criminal responsibility, 68 ALR4th 507.

Duress, necessity, or conditions of confinement as justification for escape from prison, 54 ALR5th 141.

What constitutes attempted bank robbery under 18 USCS §§ 2113(a), making it offense to take or attempt to take, by force, violence, or intimidation, any property, money, or other thing of value from bank, 37 ALR Fed. 255.

Criminal responsibility under 18 USCS § 2(b) of one who lacks capacity to commit an offense but who causes another to do so, 52 ALR Fed. 769.

Sec. 11.31.100.
Attempt.

A person is guilty of an attempt to commit a crime if, with intent to commit a crime, the person engages in conduct which constitutes a substantial step toward the commission of that crime.

In a prosecution under this section, it is not a defense that it was factually or legally impossible to commit the crime which was the object of the attempt if the conduct engaged in by the defendant would be a crime had the circumstances been as the defendant believed them to be.

In a prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant, under circumstances manifesting a voluntary and complete renunciation of the defendant’s criminal intent, prevented the commission of the attempted crime.

An attempt is

an unclassified felony if the crime attempted is murder in the first degree;

a class A felony if the crime attempted is an unclassified felony other than murder in the first degree;

a class B felony if the crime attempted is a class A felony;

a class C felony if the crime attempted is a class B felony;

a class A misdemeanor if the crime attempted is a class C felony;

a class B misdemeanor if the crime attempted is a class A or class B misdemeanor.

If the crime attempted is an unclassified crime described in a state law which is not part of this title and no provision for punishment of an attempt to commit the crime is specified, the punishment for the attempt is imprisonment for a term of not more than half the maximum period prescribed as punishment for the unclassified crime, or a fine of not more than half the amount of the maximum fine prescribed as punishment for the unclassified crime, or both. If the crime attempted is punishable by an indeterminate or life term, the attempt is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “renunciation” which is not “voluntary and complete,” “crime” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Solicitation - AS

11.31.110

Multiple convictions barred - AS

11.31.140

Substantive crimes involving attempt or solicitation - AS

11.31.150

Original Code Provision - AS 11.05.020.

TD: II, 71-77.

For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies, AS

12.55.135

for punishment for misdemean- ors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For legislative purpose of ch. 45, SLA 1982, see § 1, ch. 45, SLA 1982 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.31.110.
Solicitation.

A person commits the crime of solicitation if, with intent to cause another to engage in conduct constituting a crime, the person solicits the other to engage in that conduct.

In a prosecution under this section,

it is not a defense

that the defendant belongs to a class of persons who by definition are legally incapable in an individual capacity of committing the crime that is the object of the solicitation; or

that a person whom the defendant solicits could not be guilty of the crime that is the object of the solicitation;

it is an affirmative defense that the defendant, under circumstances manifesting a voluntary and complete renunciation of the defendant’s criminal intent, after soliciting another person to engage in conduct constituting a crime, prevented the commission of the crime.

Solicitation is

an unclassified felony if the crime solicited is murder in the first degree;

a class A felony if the crime solicited is an unclassified felony other than murder in the first degree;

a class B felony if the crime solicited is a class A felony;

a class C felony if the crime solicited is a class B felony;

a class A misdemeanor if the crime solicited is a class C felony;

a class B misdemeanor if the crime solicited is a class A or class B misdemeanor.

If the crime solicited is an unclassified crime described in a state law which is not part of this title and no provision for punishment of a solicitation to commit the crime is specified, the punishment for the solicitation is imprisonment for a term of not more than half the maximum period prescribed as punishment for the unclassified crime, or a fine of not more than half the maximum fine prescribed as punishment for the unclassified crime, or both. If the crime solicited is punishable by an indeterminate or life term, the solicitation is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “renunciation” which is not “voluntary and complete,” “crime,” “solicits” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Attempt - AS

11.31.100

Multiple convictions barred - AS

11.31.140

Substantive crimes involving attempt or solicitation - AS

11.31.150

Original Code Provision - AS 11.10.070.

TD: II, 77-79.

For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies, AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For legislative purpose of ch. 45, SLA 1982, see § 1, ch. 45, SLA 1982, in the Temporary and Special Acts; for legal accountability based on the conduct of another and complicity, see AS

11.16.110

.

For applicability provisions relating to the 1999 amendment of subsection (c), see § 16, ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.31.120.
Conspiracy.

An offender commits the crime of conspiracy if, with the intent to promote or facilitate a serious felony offense, the offender agrees with one or more persons to engage in or cause the performance of that activity and the offender or one of the persons does an overt act in furtherance of the conspiracy.

If an offender commits the crime of conspiracy and knows that a person with whom the offender conspires to commit a serious felony offense has conspired or will conspire with another person or persons to commit the same serious felony offense, the offender is guilty of conspiring with that other person or persons to commit that crime whether or not the offender knows their identities.

In a prosecution under this section, it is a defense that the defendant was merely present at the time that two or more other persons agreed to engage in or cause the performance of a serious felony offense.

In a prosecution under this section, it is not a defense that a person with whom the defendant conspires could not be guilty of the crime that is the object of the conspiracy because of

lack of criminal responsibility or other legal incapacity or exemption;

belonging to a class of persons who by definition are legally incapable in an individual capacity of committing the crime that is the object of the conspiracy;

unawareness of the criminal nature of the conduct in question or of the criminal purpose of the defendant; or

any other factor precluding the culpable mental state required for the commission of the crime.

If the offense that the conspiracy is intended to promote or facilitate is actually committed, a defendant may not be convicted of conspiring to commit that offense with another person for whose conduct the defendant is not legally accountable under AS

11.16.120(b)

.

In a prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant, under circumstances manifesting a voluntary and complete renunciation of the defendant’s criminal intent, either (1) gave timely warning to law enforcement authorities; or (2) otherwise made proper effort that prevented the commission of the crime that was the object of the conspiracy. Renunciation by one conspirator does not affect the liability of another conspirator who does not join in the renunciation.

Notwithstanding AS

22.10.030

, venue in actions in which the crime of conspiracy is alleged to have been committed may not be based solely on the location of overt acts done in furtherance of the conspiracy.

In this section,

“overt act in furtherance of the conspiracy” means an act of such character that it manifests a purpose on the part of the actor that the object of the conspiracy be completed;

“serious felony offense” means an offense

against the person under AS 11.41, punishable as an unclassified or class A felony;

involving controlled substances under AS 11.71, punishable as an unclassified, class A, or class B felony;

that is criminal mischief in the first degree under AS

11.46.475

;

that is terroristic threatening in the first degree under AS

11.56.807

;

that is human trafficking in the first degree under AS

11.41.360

;

that is sex trafficking in the first degree under AS

11.66.110

; or

that is arson in the first degree under AS

11.46.400

or arson in the second degree under AS

11.46.410

.

Conspiracy is

an unclassified felony if the object of the conspiracy is murder in the first degree;

a class A felony if the object of the conspiracy is a crime punishable as an unclassified felony other than murder in the first degree;

a class B felony if the object of the conspiracy is a crime punishable as a class A felony;

a class C felony if the object of the conspiracy is a crime punishable as a class B felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 3 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (h)(1) (formerly (i)(1)) was enacted as the last sentence of (a). Reorganized in 1994, at which time the text enacted as (i) was designated as (i)(2).
Subsection (h) was formerly (i), and subsection (i) was formerly (h); relettered in 2002.

Cross references. —

For special minimum sentences for this offense when directed at certain officers or medical personnel or when occurring on school grounds or buses, see AS

12.55.135(d)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments adding (h)(2)(E) and (F) apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For letter of intent adopted by the legislature in connection with the enactment of this section, see 1993 Senate Journal at 611 — 612.

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.31.125.
Duration of conspiracy for purposes of limitations of actions.

For purposes of applying AS 12.10 governing limitations of actions, in a prosecution under AS

11.31.120

, the statute of limitations begins to run

when all the crimes that are serious felony offenses that are its objects are completed;

if all the crimes that are its objects are not completed, when the last overt act in furtherance of the conspiracy is done by the defendant or any of the other coconspirators; or

when the defendant informs law enforcement authorities of the existence of the conspiracy and of the defendant’s participation in it.

In this section, “overt act in furtherance of the conspiracy” has the meaning given in AS

11.31.120

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 3 SLA 1994)

Sec. 11.31.140.
Multiple convictions barred.

It is not a defense to a prosecution under AS

11.31.100

—

11.31.120

that the crime the defendant attempted to commit, solicited to commit, or conspired to commit was actually committed pursuant to the attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy.

A person may not be convicted of more than one crime defined by AS

11.31.100

—

11.31.120

for conduct designed to commit or culminate in commission of the same crime.

A person may not be convicted on the basis of the same course of conduct of both (1) a crime defined by AS

11.31.100

or

11.31.110

; and (2) the crime that is the object of the attempt or solicitation.

This section does not bar inclusion of multiple counts in a single indictment or information charging commission of a crime defined by AS

11.31.100

—

11.31.120

and commission of the crime that is the object of the attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 3 SLA 1994)

Sec. 11.31.150.
Substantive crimes involving attempt or solicitation.

Notwithstanding AS

11.31.140(d)

,

a person may not be charged under AS

11.31.100

if the crime allegedly attempted by the defendant is defined in such a way that an attempt to engage in the proscribed conduct constitutes commission of the crime itself;

a person may not be charged under AS

11.31.110

if the solicitation in question is defined as a specific crime under other provisions of law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision - None.

TD: IV, 14.